Massachusetts, session 194th, H4375.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
1 SECTION 1. To provide for supplementing certain items in the general appropriations act
2 and other appropriation acts for fiscal year 2026, the sums set forth in section 2 are hereby
3 appropriated from the Education and Transportation Innovation and Capital Fund established in
4 section 2DDDDDD of chapter 29 of the General Laws, unless specifically designated otherwise
5 in this act or in those appropriation acts, for the several purposes and subject to the conditions
6 specified in this act or in those appropriations acts and subject to the laws regulating the
7 disbursement of public funds for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026. All appropriations in said
1 of 16

8 section 2 shall not be subject to section 5D of chapter 29 of the General Laws. These sums shall
9 be in addition to any amounts previously appropriated and made available for the purposes of
10 those items. These sums shall be made available through the fiscal year ending June 30, 2028.
11 SECTION 2.
12 EXECUTIVE OFFICE FOR ADMINISTRATION AND FINANCE
13 Office of the Secretary
14 1596-7066 For a bridge funding reserve to support public institutions of higher education
15 in the commonwealth to enable them to adapt to federal funding uncertainty, loss or
16 diminishment of federal research funding, and to encourage advancement of scientific research,
17 enhance employment opportunities and talent development, and to enable participation in
18 partnerships and joint ventures related to research and innovation; provided, that the funds shall
19 be administered by the executive office for administration and finance in consultation with the
20 executive office of education, executive office of labor and workforce development and the
21 executive office of economic development; provided, further, that up to $80,000,000 may be
22 used as flexible funding support for public institutions of higher education in the commonwealth
23 to fund direct and indirect costs of research, to retain talent and preserve the pace of scientific
24 discovery in the commonwealth; provided, further, that up to $40,000,000 may be used as a
25 talent retention and extension reserve to fund positions in research and teaching, including
26 graduate, post doctorate and other early career research professionals that would otherwise be
27 unfunded due to reductions in federal indirect rates, to build a bridge to future funding levels and
28 sources; provided, further, that up to $30,000,000 may be used to fund research opportunities,
29 partnerships and joint ventures to support research activity, employment, and advance innovation
2 of 16

30 and opportunity in the commonwealth, including considerations of regional impact and
31 geographic equity, including but not limited to opportunities related to advanced manufacturing
32 and technology, agricultural science and technology, bioengineering and life sciences, civil
33 engineering and advanced construction materials, climate and environmental science, ecology,
34 education and child development, electronics, energy, fisheries and wildlife science and
35 management, forestry science and management, marine science and technology, medical science
36 and technology, meteorology and atmospheric science, nursing science, public health and applied
37 health sciences, and robotics …………………………………………….$200,000,000
38 SECTION 3. Section 1 of chapter 23G of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
39 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the definition of “Improvement” the
40 following definition:-
41 “Independent research institution”, a nonprofit research organization that holds tax-
42 exempt status granted under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, or is otherwise
43 recognized as a tax-exempt charitable organization by the department of revenue and shall be
44 organized and operated exclusively for scientific or educational purposes; provided, however,
45 that “independent research institution” shall not mean a hospital, college, university or private
46 foundation.
47 SECTION 4. Said chapter 23G of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended
48 by inserting after section 47 the following sections:-
49 Section 48. (a) There shall be within the agency a Research Resilience Fund, to which
50 shall be credited appropriations or other monies authorized by the general court and specifically
51 designated to be credited to the fund, such additional funds as are subject to the direction and
3 of 16

52 control of the agency, grants or loans or private investment capital which may properly be
53 applied in furtherance of the objectives of the fund, proceeds from the sale of qualified
54 investments secured or held by the fund, fees and charges imposed relative to the making of
55 qualified investments, as defined and approved under rules approved by the review board created
56 in section 49 for the fund, secured or held by the fund and other monies which may be available
57 to the agency or the review board for the purposes of the fund from another source or sources.
58 The agency shall hold the fund in an account or accounts separate from other funds or accounts
59 and shall manage the fund on behalf of the review board, under rules and policies established by
60 the review board.
61 (b) The agency, on behalf of the review board, shall invest and reinvest the fund and the
62 income of the fund as follows:
63 (1) in the making of qualified investments, under rules approved by the review board;
64 (2) in defraying the ordinary and necessary expenses of administration and operation
65 associated with the fund and the administration and operation of the review board established
66 under section 49;
67 (3) in the investment of funds not required for immediate disbursement in the purchase of
68 such securities as may be lawful investments for fiduciaries in the commonwealth;
69 (4) for the payment of principal or interest on qualified investments secured by the fund
70 or the payment of a redemption premium required to be paid when such qualified investments
71 are redeemed prior to maturity; provided, however, that monies in the fund shall not be
72 withdrawn at any time in such an amount as would reduce the amount of the fund to less than the
73 minimum requirement established jointly by the agency and review board, except for the purpose
4 of 16

74 of paying binding obligations associated with qualified investments which are secured by the
75 fund as the obligations become payable.
76 (c) The fund shall be held and applied by the agency, on behalf of the review board, to
77 make qualified investments designed to advance the following public purposes:
78 (1) to provide financial assistance to universities, colleges hospitals and independent
79 research institutions undertaking research that has been subject to elimination or reduction in
80 federal funding from the National Science Foundation, National Institute of Health or the
81 National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration;
82 (2) to stimulate increased funding for high impact research operations conducted at
83 Massachusetts hospitals, universities and independent research institutions by leveraging private
84 funding for and institutional resources for research operations located in the commonwealth,
85 which will lead to increased and more rewarding employment opportunities for Massachusetts
86 residents and will enhance economic growth by supporting science and technology research,
87 innovation, discovery and education in the commonwealth;
88 (3) to make matching grants for research projects sponsored by and located within
89 Massachusetts universities, colleges, public instrumentalities, hospitals, and independent
90 research institutions, to fund scientific research activities and operations in the commonwealth,
91 so as to increase and strengthen the employment and training opportunities for scientific
92 researchers in the commonwealth, maintain the pace of scientific discovery and innovation, and
93 support the economic development and employment opportunities related to the
94 commonwealth’s research and innovation ecosystem;
5 of 16

95 (4) to provide bridge financing to Massachusetts universities, colleges, public
96 instrumentalities, hospitals, and independent research institutions in anticipation of the receipt of
97 grants of the type described in clause (3), philanthropic funds, and grants awarded or to be
98 awarded by the federal government, industry or other sources;
99 (5) to make grants to the Massachusetts Life Sciences Center, established by chapter 23I,
100 to fund activities that facilitate the transfer of technology from the commonwealth’s research
101 institutions to the commonwealth’s life sciences, pharmaceutical, biotechnology, medical device,
102 and health therapeutical industries, for productive use by such industries and to improve
103 employment opportunities, sustain economic growth, and enhance the life sciences innovation
104 ecosystem in the commonwealth;
105 (6) to provide for a talent retention and development fund to award 1-year fellowships to
106 graduate, post doctorate and other early career research professionals residing in Massachusetts,
107 which can be used for direct research and educational expenses not to exceed $100,000 per
108 individual; and
109 (7) to provide matching grants in the field of marine sciences and marine science
110 technology for universities, colleges, and independent research institutions within the
111 commonwealth.
112 (d) The agency shall make no such qualified investment under this section unless the
113 review board finds that, to the extent possible, said qualified investment is such that a definite
114 benefit to the economy of the commonwealth and material benefit to employment in a research
115 enterprise in the commonwealth for no less than 12 months may reasonably be expected as a
116 result. In addition, the agency shall make no such qualified investment under this section unless
6 of 16

117 such qualified investment complies with rules approved by the review board. The rules approved
118 by the review board shall provide for the following:
119 (1) repayment in whole or in part of any grants, loans, or other qualified investments
120 under this section if the recipient of funds fails to meet job retention or hiring targets or other
121 covenants in the agreement related to use of funds and outcomes;
122 (2) define which entities shall be eligible for funding for purposes of this section;
123 provided, however, that only entities domiciled or chartered within the commonwealth shall be
124 eligible; provided, however, that eligible entities shall include any public colleges and
125 universities established in the commonwealth under chapter 73 or chapter 75, nonprofit hospitals
126 in the commonwealth licensed by the department of public health under chapter 111, nonprofit
127 universities and colleges under chapter 180 with their primary campus located in the
128 commonwealth, independent research institutions established in the commonwealth that perform
129 scientific research with significant employment and economic impact in the commonwealth,
130 which the review board has classified as eligible;
131 (3) define eligibility requirements and other terms and conditions for fellowships
132 awarded through the talent retention and development fund under clause (c)(5);
133 (4) set the terms and conditions for investments which are to constitute qualified
134 investments, which may include, without limitation, loans, working capital and contract based
135 loans, guarantees, equity investments, grants made under subsection (c), or other financing or
136 credit enhancing devices, as made by the agency directly or on its own behalf or in conjunction
137 with other public instrumentalities or private institutions;
7 of 16

138 (5) define the minimum balance requirement of the fund, which shall be no less than
139 $1,000,000 or the total amount of outstanding obligations of the fund, whichever is greater;
140 (6) define the maximum aggregate amount of grants made under subsection (c) to any
141 single researcher or group of researchers currently employed by any single university, college,
142 public instrumentality, hospital, or independent research institution eligible for funding;
143 (7) set forth the terms, procedures, standards and conditions which the review board shall
144 employ to identify qualified applications, process applications, make grant determinations and
145 investments, safeguard the fund, advance the objectives of increasing employment opportunities
146 and preserving research-related employment and economic growth in the commonwealth, secure
147 the participation of other public instrumentalities, private institutions and other funding sources;
148 and
149 (8) set forth the terms, procedures, standards and conditions which the review board shall
150 employ with respect to certain qualified investments, provided, however, that said rules shall
151 provide that each recipient of a qualified investment other than a grant or fellowship under
152 paragraph (c) shall be required to pay a fee as a condition of such receipt, which fee may take the
153 form of points, an interest rate premium or a contribution of warrants or other form of equity or
154 consideration to the fund as prescribed by the review board; and provided, further, that said rules
155 shall provide for negotiated agreements between the agency and each recipient of a qualified
156 investment regarding the terms and conditions by which the fund’s support of a recipient could
157 be reduced or withdrawn.
158 (e) The agency may solicit investments by private institutions or investors in the activities
159 of the fund and may reach agreements with such private institutions or investors regarding the
8 of 16

160 terms of such investments including, without limitation, the rights of such investors to participate
161 in the income or appropriation of the fund. To help secure investments by private institutions or
162 investors in the activities of the fund, the review board may develop a proposal relative to the
163 creation of a separate investment entity or alternative structure which would allow for the
164 commingling of the resources of the fund with the maximum participation by such private
165 institutions or investors in a manner which is consistent with the public purpose of the fund and
166 under terms and conditions calculated to protect and preserve the assets of the fund; provided,
167 however, that if the creation or operation of such a separate entity or alternative structure as
168 proposed by the review board would require additional or clarifying amendments to this chapter,
169 said proposal shall include proposed statutory language.
170 (f) An annual report on the fund, including amounts granted and invested, recipients of
171 funding, and remaining fund balance, copies of the approved rules and any modifications to the
172 rules shall be submitted to the chairs of the house and senate committees on ways and means, the
173 joint committee on economic development and emerging technologies, the joint committee on
174 health care financing, and the joint committee on higher education, and the clerks of the house of
175 representatives and the senate no later than March 1, 2026 and annually thereafter by March 1.
176 (g) Qualified investment transactions undertaken by the agency on behalf of the review
177 board under this section shall not, except as specified in this section, be subject to chapter 175,
178 and shall be payable solely from the fund and shall not constitute a debt or pledge of the faith
179 and credit of the commonwealth, the agency or any subdivision of the commonwealth.
180 (h) The agency, on behalf of the review board, shall not make an expenditure from or
181 commitment of the assets of the fund, including, without limitation, the making of grants or
9 of 16

182 qualified investments secured by the fund, if such expenditure would reduce the amount of the
183 fund below the minimum requirement established by law; provided, that at no time shall the
184 minimum requirement of the fund be less than the maximum amount of principal and interest
185 becoming due in the current and succeeding fiscal year of the agency on all outstanding
186 obligations which are secured by the fund or such greater amount as may be set forth in the rules
187 governing the fund.
188 Section 49. (a) There shall be a review board to be known as the Research Opportunity
189 Review Board, with authority to direct the expenditure of monies from the Research Resilience
190 Fund established in section 48 of this chapter, which shall consist of the director of the agency,
191 who will act as secretary and will be a non-voting member of the review board, the director of
192 the Massachusetts Life Sciences Center, 6 persons to be appointed by the governor, 1 of whom
193 shall have knowledge of higher education leadership at a major research university, 1 of whom
194 shall have knowledge of health care at a research or teaching hospital, 1 of whom shall have
195 knowledge of the life sciences industry, 1 of whom shall have knowledge of philanthropy related
196 to health care and higher education, 1 of whom shall have knowledge of scientific research at an
197 independent research institution including career pathways for scientific researchers in
198 Massachusetts, and 1 of whom shall have knowledge of technology transfer and
199 commercialization activities at research institutions, 1 person to be appointed by the speaker of
200 the house of representatives with knowledge of scientific and academic research, and 1 person to
201 be appointed by the senate president with knowledge of scientific and academic research;
202 provided, however, that the director of the Massachusetts Life Sciences Center may designate
203 another person to act in such member’s place for a particular purpose, including the right to
204 attend and vote at a meeting of the review board.
10 of 16

205 Each appointed member of the review board shall serve for a term of 2 years, until such
206 member’s successor is appointed, or until the balance of the Research Resilience Fund reaches
207 its minimum required level, whichever occurs first. A person appointed to fill a vacancy on the
208 review board shall be appointed in a like manner and shall serve for the remaining term of the
209 vacating member, or until the balance of the Research Resilience Fund reaches its minimum
210 required level, whichever occurs first. A member of the review board appointed by the governor
211 may be removed by the governor for cause. The governor may dissolve the board under this
212 section when the balance of the Research Resilience Fund reaches its minimum required level.
213 (b) The governor shall appoint the initial chairperson and vice chairperson of the review
214 board with a term of two years. Thereafter, the members shall annually elect a chairperson and
215 vice chairperson and shall adopt by-laws governing the affairs of the review board. Five
216 members of the review board shall constitute a quorum and the affirmative vote of a majority of
217 the members present and eligible to vote at a meeting shall be necessary for an action to be taken
218 by the review board; provided, however, that no vacancy in the membership of the review board
219 shall impair the right of a quorum to exercise the powers of the review board.
220 (c) The members shall serve without compensation, but each member shall be entitled to
221 reimbursement for actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of official duties
222 as approved by majority vote of the review board.
223 (d) The review board may meet as often as the members shall decide; provided, however,
224 that it shall meet at least once in each calendar quarter and its approval shall be necessary for an
225 expenditure from, or commitment of, the assets of the fund or entry into contracts of the type
226 specified in subsection (h).
11 of 16

227 (e) The review board shall make awards from the Research Resilience Fund to eligible
228 recipients for high impact research opportunities in Massachusetts, considering the following
229 factors:
230 (1) amount of resources to be leveraged, including funding from private philanthropic,
231 industry, finance, and institutional sources, and other resources including in-kind contributions
232 leveraged or matched with the award to be funded from the Research Resilience Fund;
233 (2) amount of jobs including direct and indirect employment that will be retained or
234 added in Massachusetts hospitals, universities, colleges, and independent research institutions
235 with the award to be funded from the Research Resilience Fund and other funding leveraged
236 under clause (1);
237 (3) potential for scientific advancement due to the research to be funded with the award
238 from the Research Resilience Fund and other funding leveraged under clause (1), with an
239 emphasis on research with a strong potential for near-term commercialization of an innovation or
240 technology that is likely to support the creation of new jobs in the commonwealth;
241 (4) potential for benefit to the public or public health due to the research to be funded
242 with the award from the Research Resilience Fund and other funding leveraged under clause (1);
243 (5) potential benefit to the science, technology and innovation ecosystem in
244 Massachusetts and potential for future economic growth in Massachusetts due to the research to
245 be funded with the award from the Research Resilience Fund and other funding leveraged under
246 clause (1);
12 of 16

247 (6) potential benefit to the talent pipeline and the retention of graduate students, post
248 doctoral students, and other early-career research professionals in Massachusetts due to the
249 research to be funded with the award from the Research Resilience Fund and other funding
250 leveraged under clause (1);
251 (7) potential benefit to vulnerable populations of the research to be funded with the award
252 from the Research Resilience Fund and other funding leveraged under clause (1); and
253 (8) impact and amount of funding withdrawn, reduced, delayed, or terminated by the
254 National Institutes of Health, National Science Foundation, and National Oceanic and
255 Atmospheric Administration for the research to be funded with the award from the Research
256 Resilience Fund and other funding leveraged under clause (1).
257 (f) The review board may, by majority vote, elect, in its discretion, to delegate some or all
258 of the committee’s powers to the board or the staff of the agency; provided, that, any such
259 delegation may be revoked at any time by majority vote of the review board.
260 (g) The agency shall manage the qualified investments made from the fund on behalf of
261 the review board including, without limitation, the closing, servicing, monitoring, underwriting
262 and where appropriate, the enforcement of rights with respect to such management and shall
263 provide such staff and supporting assistance as deemed appropriate by the board of directors of
264 the agency to enable the review board to discharge its duties in a manner consistent with its
265 public purpose. Subsection (d), subsections (f) to (i), inclusive and subsection (l) of section 2 of
266 this chapter shall also apply to the members and affairs of the review board.
13 of 16

267 (h) The review board and the agency may award 1 or more contracts with regard to the
268 management of the fund, which may provide performance-based incentives, with regard to such
269 management.
270 SECTION 5. Subsection (a) of section 2EEEEEE of chapter 29 of the General Laws, as
271 inserted by chapter 214 of the acts of 2024, is hereby amended by inserting after the word
272 “Matching” the following words:- , Fiscal Resilience.
273 SECTION 6. Subsection (d) of section 2EEEEEE, as so appearing, is hereby amended
274 by striking out the words “and (iii)” and inserting in place thereof the following words:-
275 (iii) protecting the commonwealth from the elimination, reduction, or material delay of
276 federal funds upon a determination by the secretary that the elimination, reduction, or material
277 delay of such federal funds would materially impact public health, safety or welfare, or the fiscal
278 stability of the commonwealth or any of its political subdivisions, in accordance with guidance
279 issued by the executive office for administration and finance; (iv) improving the financial
280 stability of hospitals and community health centers in the commonwealth that provide health care
281 to low-income, uninsured or underinsured residents, including by transferring any amounts in the
282 fund to the Health Safety Net Trust Fund, in accordance with guidance issued by the executive
283 office for administration and finance in consultation with the executive office of health and
284 human services; (v) funding pay-as-you-go capital for any capital project or program up to the
285 amount otherwise authorized by the General Court for such project or program in chapter 238 of
286 the acts of 2024, in accordance with guidance issued by the executive office for administration
287 and finance; and (vi)
14 of 16

288 SECTION 7. Subsection (d) of said section 2EEEEEE, as so appearing, is hereby
289 further amended by inserting after the word “Matching” the following word:- , Fiscal Resilience.
290 SECTION 8. Subsection (e) of said section 2EEEEEE, as so appearing, is hereby
291 amended by inserting after the word “Matching” the following word:- , Fiscal Resilience.
292 SECTION 9. Section 3 of chapter 214 of the acts of 2024 is hereby amended by striking
293 out the figure “2026” and inserting in place thereof the following figure:- 2029.
294 SECTION 10. Said section 3 of said chapter 214 of the acts of 2024 is hereby further
295 amended by inserting after the word “Matching” the following word:- , Fiscal Resilience.
296 SECTION 11. Section 4 of said chapter 214 of the acts of 2024 is hereby further
297 amended by inserting after the word “Matching” the following word:- , Fiscal Resilience.
298 SECTION 12. Said section 4 of chapter 214 of the acts of 2024 is hereby further
299 amended by inserting after the figure “117-169” the following words:-
300 and funding to organizations that hold tax-exempt status granted under section 501(c)(3)
301 of the Internal Revenue Code, or are otherwise recognized as a tax-exempt charitable
302 organization by the department of revenue that have experienced elimination, reduction,
303 disruption or delay of federal funding, for purposes of protecting jobs, improving employment,
304 and promoting opportunities, the economic vitality and the public health of the commonwealth.
305 SECTION 13. Said section 4 of chapter 214 of the acts of 2024 is hereby further
306 amended by inserting after the word “finance;” the following words:-
307 provided further, that not more than $200,000,000 may be transferred to the Research
308 Resilience Fund to support scientific research in the commonwealth, including but not limited to
15 of 16

309 research in health and health care, life sciences, technology, biotechnology, and other scientific
310 research at institutions of higher education, hospitals, and independent research institutions in
311 Massachusetts; preserve the pace of innovation and discovery, retain talent, preserve jobs and
312 promote economic growth in Massachusetts; and leverage funding from various sources
313 including nonprofits, institutions, industry, finance, and philanthropy; provided further, that the
314 executive office for administration and finance may enter into any agreements and transfer any
315 funds available under this section necessary to carry out the purposes of this clause;
316 SECTION 14. Section 4 of chapter 214 of the acts of 2024 is hereby further amended by
317 striking out the figure “2026” and inserting in place thereof the following figure:- 2029.
318 SECTION 15. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, officers of the
319 Massachusetts Development Finance Agency, employees within the executive office of the
320 governor, and employees within the executive office for administration and finance may solicit
321 gifts or grants from a charitable foundation, a private corporation, or an individual for deposit in
322 the Research Resilience Fund or associated funds established under chapter 23G of the General
323 Laws for purposes of section 48 of said chapter 23G.
16 of 16